Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.255

Provision of health services in public and private schools—Employee job description.

Any employee of a public school district or private school that performs health services, such as catheterization, must have a job description that lists all of the health services that the employee may be required to perform for students.

[ 2003 c 172 s 2.]